tools/AutoRestTest/aratrl-service/jdk8_1/cs/rest/original/languagetool/languagetool-language-modules/eo/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/eo/hunspell/eo.dic
d-r/X+
d-rin/X+
ekz-/X+
ekz-r/X+
E-/X+
E-ist/X+
Esp-ist/X+
F-in/X+
ges-r/X+
k-d/X+
k-i/X+
nif/X+
n-r/X+
s-an/X+
s-in/X+
s-r/X+
abĥaz/X-
afrikans/X-
amhar/X-
arab/X-
asam/X-
ajmar/X-
azerbajĝan/X-
baŝkir/X-
belorus/X-
bulgar/X-
bihar/X-
bislam/X-
bengal/X-
tibet/X-
breton/X-
katalun/X-
korsik/X-
ĉeĥ/X-
kimr/X-
dan/X-
german/X-
dzonk/X-
grek/X-
angl/X-
esperant/X-
hispan/X-
eston/X-
eŭsk/X-
pers/X-
finn/X-
fiĝi/X-
fero/X-
franc/X-
fris/X-
irland/X-
gael/X-
galeg/X-
gvarani/X-
malnovgrek/X-
guĝarat/X-
haŭs/X-
hebre/X-
hind/X-
kroat/X-
hungar/X-
armen/X-
interlingva/X-
indonezi/X-
okcidental/X-
eskim/X-
island/X-
ital/X-
inuit/X-
japan/X-
jav/X-
kartvel/X-
kazaĥ/X-
gronland/X-
kmer/X-
kanar/X-
kore/X-
kaŝmir/X-
kurd/X-
kirgiz/X-
malnovlatin/X-
lingal/X-
laŭ/X-
litov/X-
latv/X-
malagas/X-
maori/X-
makedon/X-
malajalam/X-
mongol/X-
moldav/X-
marat/X-
malaj/X-
malt/X-
birm/X-
naur/X-
nepal/X-
nederland/X-
norveg/X-
okcitan/X-
orom/X-
oset/X-
panĝab/X-
pol/X-
paŝtu/X-
portugal/X-
keĉu/X-
romanĉ/X-
burund/X-
ruman/X-
rus/X-
ruand/X-
sanskrit/X-
sind/X-
sango/X-
serbo-kroat/X-
sinhal/X-
slovak/X-
sloven/X-
samo/X-
ŝon/X-
somal/X-
alban/X-
serb/X-
svazi/X-
sot/X-
sund/X-
sved/X-
svahil/X-
silezi/X-
tamil/X-
telugu/X-
taĝik/X-
taj/X-
tigraj/X-
turkmen/X-
filipin/X-
cvan/X-
tonga/X-
turk/X-
cong/X-
tatar/X-
akan/X-
ujgur/X-
ukrajn/X-
uzbek/X-
vjetnam/X-
volapuk/X-
volof/X-
ksos/X-
jid/X-
jorub/X-
ĝuang/X-
ĉin/X-
zulu/X-
